Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,116
Materials; petition to designate; forms.

All petitions for the purpose of designating material as provided in section 14-3,115 shall be on printed forms furnished by the city upon application and shall contain such information and shall be worded in such language as the city may from time to time direct.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 33, p. 207;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 120.
July 21, 2022